Maine, session 132, LD1599.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-J, sub-§22 is enacted to read:
22.
Emergency Maine Emergency Medical Services Legislative Per 32 MRSA
Medical Commission Diem and §99
Services Expenses
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §99 is enacted to read:
§99. Maine Emergency Medical Services Commission
1. Commission established. The Maine Emergency Medical Services Commission,
referred to in this section as "the commission," is established pursuant to Title 5, section
12004-J, subsection 22 to monitor and evaluate the State's emergency medical services
system on a continuing basis and provide recommendations to the appropriate state
agencies and to the Legislature regarding necessary changes in the emergency medical
services system.
2. Members. The commission consists of 26 members as follows:
A. Three members of the Senate, including at least one member of the party holding
the largest number of seats in the Legislature and at least one member of the party
holding the 2nd largest number of seats in the Legislature, appointed by the President
of the Senate;
B. Three members of the House of Representatives, including at least one member of
the party holding the largest number of seats in the Legislature and at least one member
of the party holding the 2nd largest number of seats in the Legislature, appointed by
the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
C. The Commissioner of Health and Human Services or the commissioner's designee;
D. The director or the director's designee;
E. The chair of the board or the chair’s designee;
F. A representative of the Office of the Governor, designated by the Governor;
G. The following 6 members, appointed by the Governor:
(1) A representative of a statewide association representing hospitals;
(2) A representative of a statewide association representing ambulance services;
(3) A representative of a statewide association representing municipalities;
(4) A representative of a statewide association representing counties;
(5) A representative of a statewide association representing fire chiefs; and
(6) A member of the public;
H. The following 5 members, appointed by the President of the Senate:
(1) A member who is employed or volunteers in the field of emergency medical
services and represents a community of 10,000 or more residents;
Page 1 - 132LR1520(01)

(2) A member who is employed or volunteers in the field of emergency medical
services and represents a community of fewer than 10,000 residents;
(3) A representative of the Maine Community College System;
(4) A member with expertise in health insurance coverage, billing and associated
matters relating to the provision of emergency medical services by an emergency
medical services provider licensed under section 82; and
(5) A member representing an emergency medical services provider licensed
under section 82 primarily engaged in the provision of nonemergency transporting;
and
I. The following 5 members, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives:
(1) A member representing an emergency medical services provider licensed
under section 82 operating primarily in a rural area of the State;
(2) A member representing an emergency medical services provider licensed
under section 82 operating primarily in a nonrural area of the State;
(3) A member who is a volunteer emergency medical services person;
(4) A representative of the state chapter of a national organization representing
emergency physicians; and
(5) A member representing air ambulance services.
3. Terms. Terms of appointment for members are as follows.
A. The terms of appointment for legislative members appointed pursuant to subsection
2, paragraphs A and B coincide with their respective legislative terms of office.
B. Of the initial appointments made under subsection 2, paragraphs G, H and I, each
appointing authority shall appoint 2 members for terms of 3 years, 2 members for terms
of 2 years and the remaining members for terms of one year. Subsequent appointments
must be made for terms of 3 years.
C. Members may serve beyond their designated terms until their successors are
appointed.
4. Officers. The director shall call the first meeting of the commission as soon as all
appointments are made and as soon as funding permits. At the first meeting, the
commission shall select a chair, a vice-chair, a secretary and a treasurer from among its
members. The commission may select new officers annually.
5. Meetings. The commission may meet as often as necessary but must meet at least
quarterly. A meeting may be called by the chair or by any 4 members. The commission
shall take and maintain minutes of all meetings.
6. Staffing. If funding permits, the commission may employ staff as needed. The
staffs of the members represented on the commission may assist the commission in carrying
out its functions and duties within the staffs' existing resources. The commission may
contract for administrative, professional and clerical services if funding permits.
7. Funding. The commission may seek, accept and expend outside funding to carry
out its duties.
Page 2 - 132LR1520(01)

8. Duties. The commission shall:
A. Regularly advise the Governor and executive officers, the Legislature, Maine
Emergency Medical Services, emergency medical services providers licensed under
section 82 and any other parties affected by the commission's recommendations
regarding emergency medical services;
B. Submit a report containing the results of the commission's studies, findings and
recommendations to the Governor and to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over public safety matters by January 1st of each year.
As resources permit, the report must include, but is not limited to:
(1) An assessment of existing and needed resources and expected resource needs
within the State's emergency medical services system and recommendations for
funding those needs;
(2) An evaluation of existing emergency medical services programs, initiatives
and resources, including recommendations for improvements, for new programs
and initiatives and for funding options for oversight and administration of the
State's emergency medical services system; and
(3) Recommendations for effective management of resources within the State's
emergency medical services system; for enhancing the collection and distribution
of emergency medical services data; regarding evaluation methodology for the
State's emergency medical services system; and for recruitment and retention of
emergency medical services persons, both paid and volunteer.
After reviewing the report submitted under this paragraph, the committee may report
out legislation relating to the report;
C. Adopt rules necessary to carry out the commission's duties. Rules adopted pursuant
to this paragraph are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A;
D. Conduct public hearings, conferences, workshops and other meetings to obtain
information about and discuss and publicize the needs of and solutions to problems
concerning the State's emergency medical services system; and
E. Submit proposed legislation to the Legislature to implement any recommendations
of the commission.